Georgia statutes. TITLE 8 Buildings and Housing
CHAPTER 3 Housing Generally

Cross references.

Relocation of persons and businesses displaced by federal-aid public works projects, O.C.G.A. §

22-4-1

et seq.

Development authorities of counties and municipalities, O.C.G.A. §

36-62-1

et seq.

Law reviews.

For comment, “Critical Housing Needs and the Emergency Low Income Housing Preservation Act of 1987:
A Short-Term Solution to a Long-Term Problem,” see 40 Emory L.J. 163 (1991).